Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2746
Sections, how construed.

Sections 30-2715 to 30-2746 shall be so construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 32.